New Jersey, session 221, A366.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    It shall be an unlawful practice for any person to sell, or offer for sale, any merchandise which uses any advertisement, on its packaging or elsewhere, which directly or indirectly links the product to, or otherwise alludes to, any controlled dangerous substance or analog: a.     To a person under 18 years of age; or b.    If the product is a food, beverage, or intended to be ingested or inhaled. The provisions of this act shall not apply to any prescription medication that is dispensed by a pharmacist pursuant to a valid prescription. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following enactment.